Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “COFA citizen” has the meaning given that term in ORS 735.604.
(b) “Dental care organization” means a prepaid managed care  health services organiza-
tion, as defined in ORS 414.025, that  contracts with the Oregon Health Authority or a coor-
dinated care organization, as defined in  ORS 414.025, to provide oral health care to medical
assistance recipients.
(2) For the  purpose of evaluating the feasibility of administering a program to provide
oral health care to COFA citizens, the Department of Consumer and Business Services  shall:
(a) Contract with, and oversee, a vendor to conduct a demographic study to determine:
(A) The dental needs of low-income COFA citizens residing in this state; and
(B) The geographic distribution of COFA citizens in this state.
(b) Issue a request for  information to dental care organizations operating in this state
to:
(A) Gauge the interest of dental  care organizations in providing oral health care to COFA
citizens;
(B) Determine the capacity of dental care organizations  to meet the oral health care
needs of COFA citizens;
(C) Obtain estimates of  the cost to contract with dental care organizations to provide
oral health care to COFA citizens; and
(D) Obtain other information necessary for  the department to compile the report de-
scribed in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) No later than April 15, 2020, the department shall  report to the interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to health, in the manner provided in ORS  192.245, the
findings from the study and an estimate of the cost  for administering a program to provide
oral health care to COFA citizens residing in this state.
Enrolled House Bill 2706 (HB 2706-A) Page 1
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $99,319, which may be expended for carrying
out section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 20, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2706 (HB 2706-A) Page 2